Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202576-3715
Act, how construed; civil and criminal immunity.

Nothing in the Foreign-owned Real Estate National Security Act shall be construed to require any person to determine or inquire whether another person is subject to or in violation of the act, and such person shall bear no civil or criminal liability under the act for the failure to make such determination or inquiry. The Attorney General, retained outside counsel, and Director of Agriculture are responsible for determining whether a person is subject to or in violation of the act.

Laws 2024, LB1301, § 18;

Laws 2025, LB7, § 9.